North Dakota, session 69, HB1485.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 50-24.1-02.6 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
50-24.1-02.6. Medical assistance benefits - Eligibility criteria.
1. The department shall provide medical assistance benefits to otherwise eligible persons who
are medically needy persons who have countable income that does not exceed an amount
determined under subsection 2.
2. The department shall establish an income level for medically needy persons at an amount no
less than required by federal law.
3. The department shall provide medical assistance benefits to children and families coverage
groups and pregnant women without consideration of assets.
4. The department shall provide medical assistance benefits to otherwise eligible pregnant
women who are lawfully present in the United States.
5. The department may require, as a condition of eligibility, individuals eligible for Medicare
part A, B, or D to apply for such coverage.
6. The department shall provide a personal monthly needs allowance, to be reviewed and
adjusted annually based on inflation.
SECTION 2. PERSONAL MONTHLY NEEDS ALLOWANCE INCREASE. The department of health
and human services shall increase the personal monthly needs allowance by fifteen dollars for an
individual covered under section 50-24.1-02.6, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending
June 30, 2027.
SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES -
PERSONAL MONTHLY NEEDS ALLOWANCE INCREASE. There is appropriated out of any moneys
in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $762,894, or so much
of the sum as may be necessary, and from other funds derived from federal and special funds, the sum
of $689,466, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of health and human
services for the purpose of a personal monthly needs allowance increase, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.

H. B. NO. 1485 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1485.
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 2 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State